District of Columbia statutes.
42-2102

Purpose.

In enacting this chapter, the Council supports the following statutory purposes:

(1)

To provide decent and affordable rental opportunities for low-income persons and homeownership opportunities to low-and moderate-income persons;

(2)

To enable organized groups of low-and moderate-income persons to obtain skills to repair, maintain, and manage residential property;

(3)

To afford highly-motivated low-and moderate-income persons the opportunity to participate fully in the production of their own decent and affordable homes;

(4)

To facilitate community development that would create jobs for low and moderate income District of Columbia residents, as well as enhance the quality of life in residential areas by establishing businesses and other community services designed to meet the needs of the neighborhood;

(5)

To provide nonprofit organizations and developers the opportunity to purchase property in the program in exchange for providing needed community service to District residents; and

(6)

To strengthen neighborhoods by returning blighted, vacant, and neglected properties to productive use.

Aug. 9, 1986, D.C. Law 6-135, § 3, 33 DCR 3771
June 11, 1999, D.C. Law 13-11, § 2(a), 46 DCR 5487
Apr. 19, 2002, D.C. Law 14-114, § 801(a), 49 DCR 1468
1981 Ed., § 45-2702.
D.C. Law 13-11 added pars. (4) and (5).
D.C. Law 14-114, in par. (1), substituted “To provide decent and affordable rental opportunities for low-income persons and” for “To provide”; made nonsubstantive changes in pars. (4) and (5); and added par. (6).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(a) of Homestead Housing Preservation Temporary Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Law 12-245, April 20, 1999, law notification 46 DCR 4158).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 2(a) of the Homestead Housing Preservation Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-556, January 12, 1999, 45 DCR 625).
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 2(a) of the Homestead Housing Preservation Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-62, May 10, 1999, 46 DCR 4454).